Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1324
Failing to render report or refusing to pay or deliver property; penalty.

(a) A person who fails to pay or deliver property within the time prescribed by the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act shall be required to pay to the State Treasurer interest calculated pursuant to section 45-103 as such section was in effect on the date the property should have been paid or delivered on the value of the property from the date the property should have been paid or delivered.

(b) A person who willfully fails to render any report or perform other duties required under the act shall pay a civil penalty of one hundred dollars for each day the report is withheld or the duty is not performed, but not more than five thousand dollars.

(c) A person who willfully fails to pay or deliver property to the State Treasurer as required under the act shall pay a civil penalty equal to twenty-five percent of the value of the property that should have been paid or delivered.

(d) The interest or penalty or any portion thereof as imposed by subsections (a), (b), or (c) of this section may be waived or remitted by the State Treasurer for good cause shown.

(e) Any person who willfully refuses to pay or deliver abandoned property to the State Treasurer as required under the act shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 24, p. 2490;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 135;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 20.